Massachusetts, session 194th, H2221.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 37R the following section:-
Section 37S. A public school, including a charter school, that serves students in any of
grades 6 to 12, inclusive, and that issues new or replacement student identification cards to
enrolled students shall include on such cards the telephone and text message number for the 988
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline.
SECTION 2. Chapter 73 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
of 2

Section 21. A public or private institution of higher education that issues new or
replacement student identification cards to enrolled students shall include on such student
identification cards the telephone and text message number for the 988 Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline.
SECTION 3. As of the effective date of this act, if a public school subject to section 37S
of chapter 71 of the General Laws or a public or private institution of higher education subject
section 21 of chapter 73 of the General Laws has a supply of unissued student identification
cards that do not comply with the requirements of said section 37S of said chapter 71 or said
section 21 of said chapter 73, the school may issue such student identification cards to students
until such remaining supply is depleted.
SECTION 4. Section 37S of chapter 71 of the General Laws and section 21 of chapter 73
of the General Laws shall apply to student identification cards issued on or after July 1, 2025.
of 2